Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 8 Medical Assistance

40-8-1.
Declaration of policy.

Whereas, in the state of Rhode Island there are many persons who do not have sufficient income and resources to meet the cost of medical care and who, except for income and resource requirements, would be eligible for aid or assistance under § 40-5.1-9 [repealed] or §

40-6-27

; and

Whereas, it is in the best interest of all the citizens of this state to promote the welfare of persons with the characteristics of persons eligible to receive public assistance and ensure that they will receive adequate medical care and treatment in time of need;

Now, therefore, it is declared to be the policy of this state to provide medical assistance for those persons in this state who possess the characteristics of persons receiving public assistance under the provisions of § 40-5.1-9 [repealed] or §

40-6-27

, and who do not have the income and resources to provide it for themselves or who can do so only at great financial sacrifice. Provided, further, that the medical assistance must qualify for federal financial participation pursuant to the provisions of Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq., as such provisions apply to medically needy only applicants and recipients.

Medical assistance shall be provided under this chapter without regard to the availability of federal financial participation: (1) To a person who does not meet the citizenship or alienage criteria under Title XIX of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq., and who was lawfully residing in the United States before August 22, 1996, and who was a resident of this state prior to July 1, 1997; and provided, however, that the person meets all other eligibility requirements under this chapter or under Title XIX or Title XXI of the Social Security Act.

Medical assistance shall also be provided under this chapter to a non-citizen child who was lawfully admitted for permanent residence on or after August 22, 1996, or who first becomes otherwise entitled to reside in the United States on or after August 22, 1996; provided, however, that the person meets all other eligibility requirements under this chapter or under Title XIX or Title XXI of the Social Security Act.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 266, § 2; G.L. 1956, § 40-10.1-1; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1983, ch. 3, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 167, art. 18, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 53, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 129, § 19; P.L. 1996, ch. 131, § 19; P.L. 1996, ch. 132, § 19; P.L. 1996, ch. 133, § 19; P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 34, § 5; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 40, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 18, § 7; P.L. 2008, ch. 9, art. 10, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 23, § 3.

40-8-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context shall otherwise require:

“Dental service” means and includes emergency care, X-rays for diagnoses, extractions, palliative treatment, and the refitting and relining of existing dentures and prosthesis.

“Department” means the department of human services.

“Director” means the director of human services.

“Drug” means and includes only drugs and biologicals prescribed by a licensed dentist or physician as are either included in the United States pharmacopoeia, national formulary, or are new and nonofficial drugs and remedies.

“Inpatient” means a person admitted to and under treatment or care of a physician or surgeon in a hospital or nursing facility that meets standards of and complies with rules and regulations promulgated by the director.

“Inpatient hospital services” means the following items and services furnished to an inpatient in a hospital other than a hospital, institution, or facility for tuberculosis or mental diseases:

Bed and board;

Nursing services and other related services as are customarily furnished by the hospital for the care and treatment of inpatients and drugs, biologicals, supplies, appliances, and equipment for use in the hospital, as are customarily furnished by the hospital for the care and treatment of patients;

Other diagnostic or therapeutic items or services, including, but not limited to, pathology, radiology, and anesthesiology furnished by the hospital or by others under arrangements made by the hospital, as are customarily furnished to inpatients either by the hospital or by others under such arrangements, and services as are customarily provided to inpatients in the hospital by an intern or resident-in-training under a teaching program having the approval of the Council on Medical Education and Hospitals of the American Medical Association or of any other recognized medical society approved by the director.

The term “inpatient hospital services” shall be taken to include medical and surgical services provided by the inpatient’s physician, but shall not include the services of a private-duty nurse or services in a hospital, institution, or facility maintained primarily for the treatment and care of patients with tuberculosis or mental diseases. Provided, further, it shall be taken to include only the following organ transplant operations: kidney, liver, cornea, pancreas, bone marrow, lung, heart, and heart/lung, and other organ transplant operations as may be designated by the director after consultation with medical advisory staff or medical consultants; and provided that any such transplant operation is determined by the director or his or her designee to be medically necessary. Prior written approval of the director, or his or her designee, shall be required for all covered organ transplant operations.

In determining medical necessity for organ transplant procedures, the state plan shall adopt a case-by-case approach and shall focus on the medical indications and contra-indications in each instance; the progressive nature of the disease; the existence of any alternative therapies; the life-threatening nature of the disease; the general state of health of the patient apart from the particular organ disease; and any other relevant facts and circumstances related to the applicant and the particular transplant procedure.

“Nursing services” means the following items and services furnished to an inpatient in a nursing facility:

Bed and board;

Nursing care and other related services as are customarily furnished to inpatients admitted to the nursing facility, and drugs, biologicals, supplies, appliances, and equipment for use in the facility, as are customarily furnished in the facility for the care and treatment of patients;

Other diagnostic or therapeutic items or services, legally furnished by the facility or by others under arrangements made by the facility, as are customarily furnished to inpatients either by the facility or by others under such arrangement;

Medical services provided in the facility by the inpatient’s physician, or by an intern or resident-in-training of a hospital with which the facility is affiliated or that is under the same control, under a teaching program of the hospital approved as provided in subsection (6); and

A personal-needs allowance of fifty dollars ($50.00) per month.

“Relative with whom the dependent child is living” means and includes the father, mother, grandfather, grandmother, brother, sister, stepfather, stepmother, stepbrother, stepsister, uncle, aunt, first cousin, nephew, or niece of any dependent child who maintains a home for the dependent child.

“Visiting nurse service” means part-time or intermittent nursing care provided by or under the supervision of a registered professional nurse other than in a hospital or nursing home.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 266, § 2; P.L. 1968, ch. 189, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 40-10.1-2; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1977, ch. 61, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 430, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 6, art. 13, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 22, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 21, § 2; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 20, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 217, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 363, § 1.

40-8-3.
Eligibility requirements.

Medical care benefits shall be provided under this chapter to at least any person:

Who has attained the age of sixty-five (65) years; or

Who has no vision or whose vision is so defective as to prevent performance of ordinary activities for which eyesight is essential; or

Who is at least eighteen (18) years of age and who is permanently and totally disabled; or

Who is under the age of eighteen (18) years, and who has been deprived of parental support or care by reason of the death, continued absence from the home, unemployment, or physical or mental incapacity of a parent (called hereafter “dependent child”) and who is living with a relative in a place of residence maintained by one or more of these relatives as his or her or their own home, or is in foster boarding care; or

The relative as defined in subsection (8) of §

40-8-2

, with whom the dependent child is living; provided the person:

Is a resident of this state; and

Is not receiving public assistance under the provisions of § 40-5.1-9(b) [repealed] or §

40-6-27

; and

Is not an inmate of a public institution other than as a patient in a medical institution; and

Is not a patient in an institution for tuberculosis or mental disease, unless the person has attained the age of sixty-five (65) years; provided, however, that this clause shall become void and of no effect if and when legislation enacted by the Congress of the United States shall become effective providing for payments for medical care on behalf of persons who have not attained the age of sixty-five (65) years who are patients in an institution for tuberculosis or mental disease; and

Has insufficient income and resources. The department shall establish income and resource rules, regulations, and limits in accordance with Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq., as applicable to the medically needy only applicants and recipients. The income limits established by the department must be more than the AFDC standard in effect on July 16, 1996, under the Rhode Island state plan approved under part A of Title IV of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 601 et seq., but shall not be more than one hundred thirty-three and one-third percent (1331/3%) of the AFDC standard in effect on July 16, 1996, under the Rhode Island state plan approved under part A of Title IV of the federal Social Security Act; provided, however, that subject to the maximum percentage increase allowable under § 1931(b)(2)(B), the department shall increase the income limits on July 1, 1999, by six and six-tenths percent (6.6%), and on January 1, of each year commencing in the year 2000 by a percentage equal to the annual federal adjustment percentage as determined under the provisions of Title XVI of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1381 et seq. The department shall establish resource limits equal to two thousand dollars ($2,000) for an individual and three thousand dollars ($3,000) for a family. Provided, however, the department shall apply to the United States Department of Health and Human Services for a waiver relating to application of the reduced resource limit, and subject to the granting of the waiver by the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services, the resource limit shall be applied to all applicants who: (A) Become eligible for benefits under this chapter on or after the effective date of this amendment and (B) Who were not receiving benefits under this chapter prior to July 1, 1993. In the event the secretary does not approve the waiver request, the current department regulations relating to resource limits shall remain in effect for all eligible beneficiaries.

For the purposes of this subsection, a vehicle necessary to transport a family member with a disability, where the vehicle is specially equipped to meet the specific needs of the person with a disability or if the vehicle is a special type of vehicle that makes it possible to transport the person with the disability, shall not be counted as resources of the applicants and recipients.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 266, § 2; G.L. 1956, § 40-10.1-3; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1978, ch. 249, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 3, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 53, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 27, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 21, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 129, § 19; P.L. 1996, ch. 131, § 19; P.L. 1996, ch. 132, § 19; P.L. 1996, ch. 133, § 19; P.L. 1998, ch. 72, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 31, art. 14, § 1.

40-8-3.1.
Life estate in property — Retained powers.

When an applicant or recipient of Medicaid owns a life estate in property that is his or her principal place of residence with the reserved power and authority, during his or her lifetime, to sell, convey, mortgage, or otherwise dispose of the real property without the consent or joinder by the holder(s) of the remainder interest, the principal place of residence shall not be regarded as an excluded resource for the purpose of Medicaid eligibility, unless the applicant or recipient individually, or through his or her guardian, conservator, or attorney in fact, conveys all outstanding remainder interest to him or herself.

An applicant or recipient who, by a deed created, executed and recorded on or before June 30, 2014, has reserved a life estate in property that is his or her principal place of residence with the reserved power and authority, during his or her lifetime, to sell, convey, mortgage, or otherwise dispose of the real property without the consent or joinder by the holder(s) of the remainder interest, shall not be ineligible for Medicaid on the basis of the deed, regardless of whether the transferee of the remainder interest is a person or persons, trust, or entity.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 19, § 3.

40-8-4.
Direct vendor payment plan.

The department shall furnish medical care benefits to eligible beneficiaries through a direct vendor payment plan. The plan shall include, but need not be limited to, any or all of the following benefits, which benefits shall be contracted for by the director:

Inpatient hospital services, other than services in a hospital, institution, or facility for tuberculosis or mental diseases;

Nursing services for the period of time as the director shall authorize;

Visiting nurse service;

Drugs for consumption either by inpatients or by other persons for whom they are prescribed by a licensed physician;

Dental services; and

Hospice care up to a maximum of two hundred and ten (210) days as a lifetime benefit.

For purposes of this chapter, the payment of federal Medicare premiums or other health insurance premiums by the department on behalf of eligible beneficiaries in accordance with the provisions of Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq., shall be deemed to be a direct vendor payment.

[Deleted by P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 12, § 2.]

[Deleted by P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 12, § 2.]

No state agency shall pay a vendor for medical benefits provided to a recipient of assistance under this chapter until and unless the vendor has submitted a claim for payment to a commercial insurance plan, Medicare, and/or a Medicaid managed care plan, if applicable for that recipient, in that order. This includes payments for skilled nursing and therapy services specifically outlined in Chapters 7, 8, and 15 of the Medicare Benefit Policy Manual.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 266, § 2; P.L. 1968, ch. 189, § 2; G.L. 1956, § 40-10.1-4; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1977, ch. 269, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 356, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 53, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 6, art. 13, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 21, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 17, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 230, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 23, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 5, § 9; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 12, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

40-8-4.1.
Lowest price.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, no medical assistance provider shall bill or charge the department of human services more than the provider’s usual and customary charge, as defined within.

The term “usual and customary” means the lowest charge, fee, or rate charged by a provider for any product or service at the time the product or service was provided. For the purpose of determining the lowest charge, fee, or rate:

If the provider offers discounts or rebates, the amount after applying discounts or rebates shall be utilized;

If the provider offers a sale for a limited period of time on any good or service, the sale price shall be utilized during the sale period;

If the provider regularly accepts less than its full charge from any customer, that amount accepted shall be utilized;

If any good or service is offered free of charge by the provider, no charge shall be made to the department for the provision of the product or service to the department or a client of the department who satisfies the terms of the offer;

If any good or service is covered under any warranty or guarantee offered by the provider, the amount charged to the department shall not exceed the amount that would otherwise be payable solely by the customer; and

If a provider structures or packages its goods or services in a manner that is exclusively or primarily used for Medicaid, Medicare, or other third-party payors, the charge for the most similar good or service offered to any other consumer shall be utilized.

The following items shall not be utilized in determining the “usual and customary” or lowest charge, fee, or rate:

Discounts offered solely to bona fide employees or family members of employees;

Discounts offered solely on the basis of age shall be utilized in determining the usual and customary charge only when the client of the department satisfies the age requirement;

Free goods or services or discounts provided to a limited number of persons on the basis of financial hardship;

Charges by an organization on a sliding-fee scale for a good or service where the organization’s charge is based on ability to pay;

Charges not collected as a result of bad debts incurred by the provider. A bad debt exists where sound business judgment indicates that there is no reasonable likelihood of recovery of the amount owed; and

Charges for educational-related services governed by 42 U.S.C. § 1396b(c).

The department may waive the application of this section if the department determines the action is necessary to ensure a continuum of care and service to persons served by community mental health centers, or to avert serious economic hardships to mental health centers.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 23, § 12.

40-8-5.
Agencies through which benefits paid.

Benefits shall be applied for, and paid in accordance with, prescribed regulations through the state offices or state or private agencies or organizations as the director may designate, and as shall be approved by the federal government, or any department or agency thereof, making funds available in support of the medical care benefits provided for in this chapter or for administration purposes. The regulations shall meet the federal requirements as may be set forth as conditions precedent to receiving the federal funds.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 266, § 2; G.L., § 40-10.1-5; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40-8-6.
Review of application for benefits.

The director, or someone designated by him or her, shall review each application for benefits filed in accordance with regulations, and shall make a determination of whether the application will be honored and the extent of the benefits to be made available to the applicant, and shall, within thirty (30) days after the filing, notify the applicant, in writing, of the determination. If the application is rejected, the notice to the applicant shall set forth therein the reason therefor. The director may at any time reconsider any determination.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 266, § 2; G.L., § 40-10.1-6; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40-8-6.1.
Provider care during pendency of application.

Definitions. The following terms shall have the meanings indicated:

“Applied income” — The amount of income a Medicaid beneficiary is required to contribute to the cost of his or her care.

“Authorized representative” — An individual who signs an application for Medicaid benefits on behalf of a Medicaid applicant.

“Complete application” — An application for Medicaid benefits filed by, or on behalf of, an individual receiving care and services from a long-term-care provider (LTC provider), including attachments and supplemental information as necessary, that provides sufficient information for the secretary or designee to determine the applicant’s eligibility for coverage. An application shall not be disqualified from status as a complete application hereunder except for failure on the part of the Medicaid applicant, or his or her authorized representative, to provide necessary information or documentation, or to take any other action necessary to make the application a complete application.

“Long-term-care provider (LTC provider)” means any of the following: a home-care provider, home nursing-care provider or nursing facility licensed pursuant to the provisions of chapter 17 of title 23; an assisted-living residence provider licensed pursuant to chapter 17.4 of title 23; an adult-day-services provider licensed pursuant to §

23-1-52

; or a Program of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly (PACE) as certified by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) and participating in the Rhode Island Medicaid program. As used in this chapter, the terms “long-term-care provider” and “LTC provider” are interchangeable.

“Medicaid applicant” — An individual who is receiving care from an LTC provider during the pendency of an application for Medicaid benefits.

“Release” means a written document that:

Indicates consent to the disclosure to an LTC provider by the secretary or designee;

Of information concerning an application for Medicaid benefits filed on behalf of a resident or patient of that LTC provider;

For the purpose of ensuring the ability to be paid for its services by that LTC provider; and

That includes the following elements:

The name of the LTC provider;

A description of the information that may be disclosed under the release;

The name of the person or persons acting on behalf of the LTC provider to whom the information may be disclosed;

The period of time for which the release will be in effect, which may extend from the date of the application for benefits until the expiration of any appeal, or any appeal period, following the determination of that application; and

The signature of the Medicaid applicant, or authorized representative, or other person legally authorized to sign on behalf of the Medicaid applicant, such as guardian or attorney-in-fact.

“Secretary” means the secretary of the Rhode Island executive office of health and human services.

“Uncompensated care” — Care and services provided by an LTC provider to a Medicaid applicant without receiving compensation therefore from Medicaid, Medicare, the Medicaid applicant, or other source. The acceptance of any payment representing actual or estimated applied income shall not disqualify the care and services provided from qualifying as uncompensated care.

Uncompensated care during pendency of an application for benefits. A nursing facility may not discharge a Medicaid applicant for non-payment of the facility’s bill during the pendency of a complete application; nor may a nursing facility charge a Medicaid applicant for care provided during the pendency of a complete application, except for an amount representing the estimated, applied income. A nursing facility may discharge a Medicaid applicant for non-payment of the facility’s bill during the pendency of an application for Medicaid coverage that is not a complete application, but only if the nursing facility has provided the patient (and his or her authorized representative, if known) with thirty (30) days’ written notice of its intention to do so, and the application remains incomplete during that thirty-day (30) period.

Uncompensated care while determination is overdue. When a complete application has been pending for ninety (90) days or longer, then upon the request of an LTC provider providing uncompensated care, the state shall make payment to the LTC provider for the care provided to the applicant in full as though the application were approved, beginning on the date of such request. Payment under this subsection shall not be made for the period prior to the LTC provider’s request, but shall continue thereafter until the application is decided. In the event the application is denied, the state shall not have any right of recovery, offset, or recoupment with respect to payments made hereunder for the period of determination. In the event the application is approved, the state may offset payments due for the period between the date of the application and the determination by any amounts paid hereunder.

Notice of application status. When an LTC provider is providing uncompensated care to a Medicaid applicant, then the LTC provider may inform the secretary or designee of its status, and the secretary or designee shall thereafter inform the nursing facility of any decision on the application at the time the decision is rendered and, if coverage is approved, of the date that coverage will begin. In addition, an LTC provider providing uncompensated care to a Medicaid applicant may inquire of the secretary or designee as to the status of that individual’s application, and the secretary or designee shall respond within five business days as follows:

Without release — If the LTC provider has not obtained a signed release, the secretary or designee must provide the following information, only, in writing: (i) Whether or not the application has been approved; (ii) The identity of any authorized representative; and (iii) If the application has not yet been decided, whether or not the application is a complete application.

With release — If the LTC provider has obtained a signed release, the secretary or designee must additionally provide any further information requested by the LTC provider, to the extent that the release permits its disclosure.

History of Section.

P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 5, § 10; P.L. 2016, ch. 150, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 158, § 1.

40-8-7.
Appeals — Hearing.

Any applicant for or recipient of benefits aggrieved because of a decision, or delay in making a decision, shall be entitled to an appeal and shall be afforded reasonable notice and opportunity for a fair hearing conducted by the director.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 266, § 2; G.L., § 40-10.1-7; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40-8-8.
Judicial review.

Findings of fact by the director shall be final and his or her decision shall be subject to judicial review only by certiorari if the decision is arbitrary, capricious, or unreasonable or inconsistent with law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 266, § 2; G.L., § 40-10.1-8; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40-8-9.
Fraudulent receipt of assistance as larceny — Penalty.

Whoever knowingly makes a false statement or misrepresents a material fact with intent thereby to defraud the state of any benefit or wrongfully to obtain or increase any benefit either for himself or herself or for any other person shall, upon conviction, be punished by a fine of not less than twenty dollars ($20.00) nor more than fifty dollars ($50.00), or by imprisonment for not more than thirty (30) days, or by both a fine and imprisonment. Each false statement or representation shall constitute a separate and distinct offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 266, § 2; G.L., § 40-10.1-9; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40-8-9.1.
Notice.

Whenever an individual who is receiving medical assistance under this chapter transfers an interest in real or personal property, the individual shall notify the executive office of health and human services within ten (10) days of the transfer. The notice shall be sent to the individual’s local office and the legal office of the executive office of health and human services and include, at a minimum, the individual’s name, social security number or, if different, the executive office of health and human services identification number, the date of transfer, and the dollar value, if any, paid or received by the individual who received benefits under this chapter. In the event an individual fails to provide notice required by this section to the executive office of health and human services and in the event an individual has received medical assistance, any individual and/or entity, who knew or should have known that the individual failed to provide the notice and who receives any distribution of value as a result of the transfer, shall be liable to the executive office of health and human services to the extent of the value of the transfer. Moreover, any such individual shall be subject to the provisions of §

40-6-15

and any remedy provided by applicable state and federal laws and rules and regulations. Failure to comply with the notice requirements set forth in the section shall not affect the marketability of title to real estate transferred while the transferor is receiving medical assistance.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 11, § 6.

40-8-10.
Recovery of benefits paid in error.

Any person, who through error or mistake of himself or herself or another, receives medical care benefits to which he or she is not entitled or with respect to which he or she was ineligible, shall be required to reimburse the state for the benefits paid through error or mistake.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 266, § 2; G.L., § 40-10.1-10; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 129.

40-8-11.
Civil action to recover benefits.

Any sums required to be reimbursed to the state under the provisions of §

40-8-10

and any benefits obtained by false statement or misrepresentation may be collected by civil action. All civil actions shall be instituted in the name of the director, and he or she shall be exempt from giving any surety for costs. In any action, the director may be represented by any qualified attorney whom he or she has designated and employed for this purpose, or, at the director’s request, by the attorney general.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 266, § 2; G.L., § 40-10.1-11; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40-8-12.
Federal approval.

The department is empowered and authorized to submit its plan for medical assistance to the federal government, or any agency or department thereof having funds available for medical care benefits provided for in this chapter, for approval pursuant to the provisions of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq. The department shall act for the state in any negotiations relative to the submission and approval of the plan and may make any arrangement or changes in its plan not inconsistent with this chapter that may be required by the Social Security Act, or the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant thereto, to obtain and retain the approval and to secure for this state the benefits of the provisions of the federal act relating to medical assistance for the needy.

The department shall make reports to the federal government, or any agency or department thereof, in the form and nature required by it, and shall, in all respects, comply with any request or direction of the federal government, or any agency or department thereof, that may be necessary to assure the correctness and verification of the reports.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 266, § 2; G.L., § 40-10.1-12; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 19.

40-8-13.
Rules, regulations, and fee schedules.

The director shall make and promulgate rules, regulations, and fee schedules not inconsistent with state law and fiscal procedures as he or she deems necessary for the proper administration of this chapter and to carry out the policy and purposes thereof, and to make the department’s plan conform to the provisions of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq., and any rules or regulations promulgated pursuant thereto.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 266, § 2; G.L., § 40-10.1-13; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

40-8-13.1.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 32, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 55, art. 12, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 19; P.L. 2009, ch. 5, art. 15, § 1; Repealed by its own terms pursuant to P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 23, § 6, effective March 30, 2010.

40-8-13.2.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 33, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 13, § 2; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 23, § 6; Repealed by its own terms and pursuant to §

40-8-13.4(g)

, effective March 30, 2010.

40-8-13.3.
Payment for services provided by in-state and out-of-state hospitals.

The department of human services and/or the secretary of the executive office of health and human services is hereby authorized and directed to amend its rules and regulations and amend the Rhode Island state plan for medical assistance (Medicaid) pursuant to Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq., in order to provide for payment to hospitals for services provided to eligible recipients in accordance with this chapter. The amended rules and regulations will continue to recognize the importance, impact, and cost of the graduate medical education and training programs supported by the hospitals in Rhode Island. The provisions of this section shall be effective upon the promulgation of the amendments and new payment methodology pursuant to this section and §

40-8-13.4

, on July 1, 2010, at which time the provisions of §§

40-8-13.2

,

27-19-14

,

27-19-15

and

27-19-16

shall be repealed in their entirety.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 23, § 7; P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 20, § 1.